Utah statutes.
56-1-17.   Adequate accommodations and regular stops required.

Every railroad company shall furnish sufficient accommodations for the transportation of all passengers and property as shall, within a reasonable time previous to the departure of any train, offer or be offered for transportation at any station, siding or stopping place established for receiving and discharging passengers and freight, and at any railroad junction; and shall take, transport and discharge such passengers and property at, from and to such places, on the due payment of tolls, freight or fare therefor; and if the company or its agents shall refuse to take and transport any passenger or property or to deliver the same at the regular appointed places, it shall be liable to the party aggrieved for all accruing damages.



No Change Since 1953

